Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1321
NEB*SAT Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The NEB*SAT Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be under the direction of the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission. The commission shall remit user and lease fees, penalty fees, nonfederal grant or contract funds, gifts, bequests, equipment purchase fee funds, and any other such fees or payments which are related to NEB*SAT, distance learning activities and programs, and other telecommunications-related activities to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Fees and revenue remitted to and expended from the fund shall not be considered to be part of the permanent operating equipment budget or construction budget of the commission and may be used for equipment purchases. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1995, LB 89, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-2108;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 977;

Laws 1999, LB 860, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.